Massachusetts, session 194th, H1120.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after chapter 176X, the following chapter:-
CHAPTER 176Y. Consumer choice of direct primary care.
Section 1. Definitions
As used in this chapter the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, have the following meanings:
"Direct primary care provider", an individual or legal entity that is licensed, registered or
otherwise authorized to provide primary care services in this state and who chooses to enter into
a direct primary care membership agreement. This includes, but is not limited to, an individual
primary care provider or other legal entity alone or with others professionally associated with the
individual or other legal entity.
of 3

"Direct primary care membership agreement", a contractual agreement between a primary
care provider and an individual patient, or his or her legal representative, in which:
i. The provider agrees to provide primary care services to the individual patient for an
agreed-to fee over an agreed-to period of time;
ii. The direct primary care provider will not bill third parties on a fee-for-service basis;
and
iii. Any per-visit charges under the agreement will be less than the monthly equivalent of
the periodic fee.
Section 2. A direct primary care membership agreement shall include the following:
i. Is between a patient or their legal representative and a health care provider;
ii. Allows either party to terminate the agreement in writing, without penalty or payment
of a termination fee, at any time or after notice as specified in the agreement which notice shall
not exceed sixty (60) days;
iii. Describes the health care services to be provided in exchange for payment of a
periodic fee;
iv. Specifies the periodic fee required and any additional fees that may be charged;
v. May allow the periodic fee and any additional fees to be paid by a third party;
vi. Prohibits the provider from charging or receiving additional compensation for health
care services included in the periodic fee; and
of 3

vii. Conspicuously and prominently states that the agreement is not health insurance and
does not meet any individual health insurance mandate that may be required by federal law.
of 3